Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $7,684,226,325 for the State School Fund.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$452,292,849 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Department of Education for the State School Fund.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$67,341,193 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the  Department of Education from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or
received by the Department of Education for the State School Fund.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding ORS 327.008 and 327.013, for the biennium beginning  July
1, 2017, the Department of Education:
(1) May spend up to $968,000 from the State School  Fund for the contract described in
ORS 329.488.
(2) May spend up to $1,600,000 from the State School Fund  for purposes related to the
Oregon Virtual School District.
(3) May spend up to  $2,470,000 from the State School Fund to provide lunches, at no
charge to the student, to students who are eligible for  reduced price lunches under the
United States Department of Agriculture’s current Income Eligibility Guidelines.
SECTION 5. (1) The Department of Education  may not spend more than $4,101,930,184
from the State School Fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2017.
(2) The Department of Education may not spend more than $4,101,930,184  from the State
School Fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2018.
SECTION 6.  The amount of $3,860,367 is  transferred from the State School Fund to the
Local Option Equalization Grants Account created in ORS 327.339.
SECTION 7. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5517 (SB 5517-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 8, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 27, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5517 (SB 5517-A) Page 2